Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article IV Offenses and Penalties
21-28-4.05.
Prohibited acts E — False representations to obtain controlled substances.

No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain a controlled substance or procure or attempt to procure the administration of a controlled substance:

By fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge;

By the forgery or alteration of a prescription or of any written order;

By the concealment of material fact; or

By the use of a false name or the giving of a false address.

Information communicated to a physician in an unlawful effort to procure the administration of a controlled substance shall not be deemed a privileged communication.

No person shall willfully make a false statement in any prescription, order, report, or record, required by this chapter.

No person shall, for the purpose of obtaining a controlled substance, falsely assume the title of, or represent himself or herself to be, a manufacturer, wholesaler, practitioner, or other authorized person.

No person shall make or utter any false or forged prescription or false or forged written order for controlled substances.

No person shall affix any false or forged label to a package or receptacle containing controlled substances.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 154, § 1.

21-28-4.06.
Prohibited acts F — Places used for unlawful sale, use, or keeping of controlled substances.

Any store, shop, warehouse, building, vehicle, aircraft, vessel, or any place which is used for the unlawful sale, use, or keeping of a controlled substance shall be deemed a common nuisance.

Any person who violates this section with respect to:

Knowingly keeping and maintaining a common nuisance as described in subsection (a) may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, and fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both;

Knowingly permitting any store, shop, warehouse, building, vehicle, aircraft, vessel, or any place which is owned or controlled by him or her to be used as a common nuisance may be imprisoned for not more than fifteen (15) years, and fined not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both;

Knowingly visiting a common nuisance as described in subsection (a) for the purpose of using or taking in any manner any controlled substance may be imprisoned for not more than one year and fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 154, § 1.

21-28-4.07.
Distribution to persons under age 18.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates §

21-28-4.01(a)

by distributing a controlled substance, excluding marijuana, listed in schedules I and II to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his or her junior shall be imprisoned to a term of not less than fifteen (15) years and may be imprisoned for life, or fined not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or both. In all such cases, the justice imposing sentence shall impose a minimum sentence of fifteen (15) years’ imprisonment and may only impose a sentence less than that minimum if he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of the alternative sentence. The finding may be based upon the character and background of the defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law enforcement authorities, the nature and circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. If a sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of fifteen (15) years is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances, which he or she found as justification for imposition of the lesser sentence.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates §

21-28-4.01(a)

by distributing a controlled substance listed in schedules III and IV to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his or her junior shall be imprisoned to a term of not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or both.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates §

21-28-4.01(a)

by distributing any controlled substance listed in schedule V or marijuana to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his or her junior shall be imprisoned to a term of not less than two (2) years nor more than five (5) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates §

21-28-4.01(d)

by distributing an imitation controlled substance to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his or her junior shall be punished by imposition of a fine authorized by §

21-28-4.01(d)

, and by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by § 21-28-4.01(d), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 645, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 275, § 1.

21-28-4.07.1.
Distribution or manufacturing in or near schools.

Any person who violates § 21-28-4.01(A),

21-28-4.01.1

, or

21-28-4.07

by distributing or manufacturing a controlled substance listed in schedules I or II in the building or on the grounds, or within three hundred (300) yards of the grounds of a public or private elementary, vocational, or secondary school, or public park or playground shall be punished by a term of imprisonment or fine, or both, up to twice that authorized by § 21-28-4.01(A) or

21-28-4.07

, but not exceeding life imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 282, § 1.

21-28-4.07.2.
Distribution to individuals without knowledge — Crime of violence.

Definitions: For the purposes of this section the following words shall have the following definitions:

“Crime of violence” means:

An offense that has an element, the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the person or property of another; or

Any other offense that is a felony and that, by its nature, involves a substantial risk that physical force against the person or property of another may be used in the course of committing the offense.

“Without that individual’s knowledge” means: that the individual is unaware that a substance with the ability to alter that individual’s ability to appraise conduct, or to decline participation in, or communicate unwillingness to participate in conduct, is administered to the individual.

Whoever, with the intent to commit a crime of violence against an individual, as defined in this section and in chapter 11-37, violates this section by distributing a controlled substance, as defined in §

21-28-1.02

, or a controlled substance analogue to an individual without that individual’s knowledge, shall be punished by a term of imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 313, § 1.

21-28-4.08.
Conspiracy.

Any person who conspires to violate any provision of this chapter is guilty of a crime and is subject to the same punishment prescribed in this chapter for the commission of the substantive offense of which there is a conspiracy to violate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-4.09.
General penalty clause.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, the penalty for which is not specified in this chapter, and of the rules and regulations of the director of health made under authority of this chapter, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year, a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-4.10.
Penalties under other laws.

Any penalty imposed for violation of this chapter is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-4.11.
Second offenses.

Any person convicted of a second offense under this chapter, except for violations of §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(i)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(v)

, or §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi)

, may be imprisoned for a term up to twice the term authorized, fined an amount up to twice that authorized, or both.

For purposes of this section, an offense is considered a second offense if, prior to his or her conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this chapter, except for violations of §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(i)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(v)

, or §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi)

, or under any statute of the United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drugs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 286, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 287, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

21-28-4.12.
Bar to prosecution.

If a violation of this chapter is a violation of a federal law or the law of another state, a conviction or acquittal under federal law or the law of another state for the same act is a bar to prosecution in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-4.13.
Impersonation of health officials — Penalties.

Every person who shall falsely assume or pretend to be the director of health or an officer, agent, inspector, or representative designated by the director as having enforcement powers shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year and/or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 210, § 1.

21-28-4.14.
Third or subsequent offenses.

Any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense under this chapter, except for violations of §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(v)

, or §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi)

, may be imprisoned for a term up to three (3) times the term authorized, and fined an amount up to three (3) times that authorized by §

21-28-4.11

, or both.

For purposes of this section, an offense is considered a third or subsequent offense if, prior to his or her conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted twice under this chapter, except for violations of §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

, §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(v)

, or §

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi)

, or twice under any statute of the United States or of any other state, or any combination of them, relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drugs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 154, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 286, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 287, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

21-28-4.15.
Employment of person under age eighteen (18).

It shall be unlawful for any person eighteen (18) years of age or older to hire, employ or use any person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his or her junior to manufacture, transport, carry, sell, prepare for sale or offer for sale a controlled substance; provided, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to individuals enrolled in a pharmacy training program approved by the director.

Any person who violates this section with respect to:

A controlled substance classified in schedules I and II, except the substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be imprisoned for not less than fifteen (15) years and may be imprisoned for a term up to life and fined not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). In all these cases, the justice imposing sentence shall impose a minimum sentence of fifteen (15) years imprisonment and may only impose a sentence less than that minimum if he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of the alternative sentence. The finding may be based upon the character and background of the defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law enforcement authorities, the nature and circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. If a sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of fifteen (15) years is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances which he or she found as justification for imposition of the lesser sentence;

A controlled substance classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years or fined not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or both;

A controlled substance classified in schedule V or marijuana, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 474, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 644, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-4.16.
Crimes against pharmacies.

Any person who: (1) breaks and enters a pharmacy or commits larceny or robbery from a pharmacist of a controlled substance, (2) aids and abets or enters any pharmacy with the intent to steal any controlled substance, or (3) takes, without permission, the controlled substance of another, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 474, § 2.

21-28-4.16.1.
Larceny of a controlled substance.

Any person who steals or attempts to steal any controlled substance from a health care facility, as defined in §

23-17-2

, a licensed pharmacy, or any other lawful place of business, where controlled substances are compounded, dispensed, administered, stored, or manufactured, including common carriers, contract carriers, or any usual or lawful carrier, shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 390, § 1.

21-28-4.16.2.
Tampering with a controlled substance.

Any person who alters, tampers, substitutes, adulterates in any manner or form, the compound, mixture, or preparation of any controlled substance in a health care facility, as defined in §

23-17-2

, shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 390, § 1.

21-28-4.17.
Additional assessment.

Should any person be convicted of or accept any plea bargain relating to an offense involving the sale of a controlled substance, that person shall, in addition to any fine imposed, be assessed an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) by the court. The assessment shall be transferred to the general treasury and deposited in the special account designated as the forfeited property account. The funds may be used by law enforcement officials in accordance with the requirements set forth in §

21-28-5.04

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 474, § 2.

21-28-4.17.1.
Assessment for drug education, counseling and treatment.

Any person convicted of any offense under this article, other than the possession offenses described in §

21-28-4.01(c)

, shall, in addition to any other sentence and/or fine imposed, be assessed four hundred dollars ($400) by the court and the assessment shall be collected from the person convicted before any other fines authorized by this chapter. The court shall not suspend any part or all of the imposition of the assessment required by this subsection, unless the court finds an inability to pay. The assessment shall be deposited in the drug education, assessment and treatment account to be used by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and the department of health for the purpose of administration, drug education, and treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 198, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-4.18.
Prohibited acts by law enforcement officials — Penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any state or municipal law enforcement official, including department of correction officers, state marshals, capital police, or other peace officers who are empowered to enforce the provisions of this chapter, or any employee of a law enforcement agency to:

Offer for sale or sell any information pertaining to an ongoing investigation conducted by any law enforcement agency of a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter; or

Use for any unauthorized purpose or sell or destroy or remove from unlawful custody any of the evidence confiscated as a result of an arrest or seizure arising from the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be imprisoned not less than ten (10) years, and may be imprisoned for a term of twenty (20) years. In all these cases, the justice imposing sentence shall impose a minimum sentence of ten (10) years imprisonment and may only impose a sentence less than that minimum if he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of the alternative sentence. The finding may be based upon the character and background of the defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law enforcement authorities, the nature and circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. If a sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of ten (10) years is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances, which he or she found as justification for imposition of the lesser sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 386, § 1.

21-28-4.19.
Reduction of sentence.

Any sentence of a person convicted for any violation of this chapter may, at any time subsequent to the imposition of the sentence, be reduced by the court upon receipt of a motion for reduction of sentence submitted by the attorney general based upon the person’s demonstrated cooperation with law enforcement authorities in the investigation and prosecution of violations of this chapter.

Nothing contained in this section shall in any way limit the court’s authority pursuant to Rule 35 of the Superior Court Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 394, § 1.

21-28-4.20.
Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) — Testing.

Any person convicted of possession of any controlled substance that has been administered with a hypodermic instrument, retractable hypodermic syringe, needle, or any similar instrument adapted for the administration of drugs shall be required to be tested for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) as provided for in chapter 23-6.3.

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 4, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 4].

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 4, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 4].

[Deleted by P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 4, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 4].

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 405, § 9; P.L. 1990, ch. 169, § 5; P.L. 1998, ch. 391, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 599, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 4.

21-28-4.21.
Drug testing required.

Every person who shall be placed on probation for a violation of any section in this chapter prohibiting the unlawful sale, distribution, manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, distribute or deliver any controlled substance as classified in schedule I or II or possession of a controlled substance as classified in schedule I or II shall, as a condition of the probation, be required to at his or her own expense submit to drug testing in accordance with the standards and procedures of the department of health not less than once per month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 457, § 2.

21-28-4.22.
Preparation of summons and related records — Consent and form.

The laws related to summonses, subpoenas and related records for violations of subparagraphs

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii)

and

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

, shall be served and heard in the same manner and in a similar form as ordinary civil actions in the traffic tribunal, as provided for in §§

31-27-12

,

31-27-12

.1,

31-41.1-1

, and as may be prescribed by rules and regulations promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal pursuant to §

8-6-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 2.